Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.470

Gender equity—"Underrepresented gender class," "equitable" defined.

(1) As used in and for the limited purposes of RCW 28B.15.450 through * 28B.15.465 and 28B.15.740, "underrepresented gender class" means female students or male students, where the ratio of participation of female or male students who are seventeen to twenty-four year old undergraduates enrolled full-time on the main campus, respectively, in intercollegiate athletics has historically been less than approximately the ratio of female to male students or male to female students, respectively, enrolled as undergraduates at an institution.

(2) As used in and for the limited purpose of RCW 28B.15.460(3)(a), an "underrepresented gender class" in interscholastic athletics means female students or male students, where the ratio of participation of female or male students, respectively, in K-12 interscholastic athletics has historically been less than approximately the ratio of female to male students or male to female students, respectively, enrolled in K-12 public schools in Washington.

(3) As used in and for the limited purposes of RCW 28B.15.460, "equitable" means that the ratio of female and male students participating in intercollegiate athletics is substantially proportionate to the percentages of female and male students who are seventeen to twenty-four year old undergraduates enrolled full time on the main campus.

[ 1997 c 5 s 4; 1989 c 340 s 6.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28B.15.465 was repealed by 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 245.

Effective date—1997 c 5: See note following RCW 28B.15.455.